District of Columbia statutes.
8-811

Identification of offenders.

(a)

A person who is stopped by a police officer or other officials authorized by the Mayor to enforce the regulations listed in § 8-802(a)(1) after the person has committed a violation of these regulations shall be required to inform the officer or other authorized official of his or her true name and address for the sole purpose of including that information on a notice of violation; provided, that no person shall be required to possess or display any documentary proof of his or her name or address in order to comply with the requirements of this section.

(b)

A person who refuses to provide his or her true name and address to a police officer or other officials authorized by the Mayor to enforce the regulations listed in § 8-802(a)(1) upon request after having been stopped for committing a violation of these regulations shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than $100 nor more than $250.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-100, § 12
as added Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-314, § 2(b), 56 DCR 200
redesignated as § 11a, Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 59(a), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated D.C. Law 6-100, § 12 as D.C. Law 6-100, § 11a.